Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6918HV (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2646 DIVISION I 1 DRONES ââ SECURITY AND PROCUREMENT 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.311C Remotely piloted 3 aircraft ââ procurement ââ limitations ââ state and political 4 subdivisions. 5 The state or a political subdivision of the state shall 6 not purchase, lease, or operate a remotely piloted aircraft, 7 as defined in section 715E.1, that is manufactured, in 8 whole or in part, by a company listed on the covered list 9 developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R. Â§1.50002 and published by the 10 public safety and homeland security bureau of the federal 11 communications commission. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 715E.3A Aggravated intrusion by use of 13 a remotely piloted aircraft ââ offense. 14 A person commits aggravated intrusion by the use of a 15 remotely piloted aircraft if the person knowingly controls the 16 flight of a remotely piloted aircraft within four hundred feet 17 of a power plant, water treatment facility, or national guard 18 facility, and the remotely piloted aircraft was manufactured 19 outside of the United States. A person who commits aggravated 20 intrusion by the use of a remotely piloted aircraft is guilty 21 of a class âDâ felony. 22 Sec. 3. REMOTELY PILOTED AIRCRAFT ââ FLEET 23 REPLACEMENT. Each state entity and political subdivision of 24 the state that owns, leases, or operates a remotely piloted 25 aircraft, as defined in section 715E.1, shall develop a plan to 26 replace all remotely piloted aircraft that were manufactured, 27 in whole or in part, by a company listed on the covered list 28 developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R. Â§1.50002 and published by the 29 public safety and homeland security bureau of the federal 30 communications commission, with remotely piloted aircraft 31 listed on the blue list of the federal defense contract 32 management agency. 33 Sec. 4. REMOTELY PILOTED AIRCRAFT ââ PROTOCOL AUDIT. The 34 chief information officer of the department of management 35 -1- LSB 6918HV (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 5 H.F. 2646 shall conduct an audit of the transmission protocols utilized 1 by remotely piloted aircraft, as defined in section 715E.1, 2 operated by state entities and political subdivisions of the 3 state to ensure compliance with the secure-by-design standards 4 of the federal cybersecurity and infrastructure security agency 5 with respect to data encryption and server localization. 6 DIVISION II 7 FOREIGN AGENTS ââ REGISTRATION 8 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 68B.37 Foreign agent registration ââ 9 penalties. 10 1. a. A foreign principal or agent of a foreign principal 11 shall register with the board within forty-eight hours after 12 engaging in lobbying or political consulting in this state. 13 b. A foreign principal or agent of a foreign principal 14 that engages in lobbying or political consulting in this state 15 shall file with the board a copy of each contract, compensation 16 schedule, and communication log related to foreign-funded 17 influence operations targeting legislators or executive branch 18 agencies in this state. 19 c. Registration as a foreign principal or agent of a foreign 20 principal pursuant to the federal Foreign Agents Registration 21 Act of 1938, as amended, 22 U.S.C. Â§611 et seq., does not 22 satisfy the requirements of this subsection. 23 2. The board shall impose a civil penalty, to be deposited 24 in the general fund of the state, of one hundred dollars per 25 day on a person who fails to register as required by subsection 26 1, to a maximum of five thousand dollars per violation. 27 3. For purposes of this section, âforeign principalâ and 28 âagent of a foreign principalâ mean the same as those terms are 29 defined in the federal Foreign Agents Registration Act of 1938, 30 as amended, 22 U.S.C. Â§611 et seq. 31 DIVISION III 32 INTERNATIONAL DIRECTIVES ââ STATE SOVEREIGNTY 33 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 1.19 International directives ââ 34 legislative approval ââ audit. 35 -2- LSB 6918HV (1) 91 ss/ns 2/ 5 H.F. 2646 1. A treaty, accord, emergency guideline, or other document 1 issued by the world health organization, united nations, or 2 world economic forum does not have the force of law in this 3 state unless the accord, emergency guideline, or other document 4 is affirmatively adopted as law in this state by the general 5 assembly. 6 2. The state of Iowa or a political subdivision of the 7 state of Iowa shall not use tax revenues or direct personnel 8 to enforce mandates derived from a treaty, accord, emergency 9 guideline, or other document issued by an international 10 organization. 11 3. Each department, authority, and agency of this 12 state shall annually conduct a review of all memoranda of 13 understanding entered into by the department, authority, or 14 agency to ensure that the department, authority, or agency is 15 not using any resources of the state to support international 16 regulatory goals that have not been adopted as law in this 17 state by the general assembly. 18 4. The state of Iowa hereby affirms, pursuant to the tenth 19 amendment to the Constitution of the United States, that 20 powers relating to public health and police powers in this 21 state reside exclusively with the state of Iowa and not any 22 international organization. 23